Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 45
PUBLIC DOMAIN RANGE

Section

35-45-101. Determination of grazing rights.

To prevent dissension and breach of the peace, the question as to the kind of livestock, whether cattle or sheep, that shall have the preferred or better right to graze upon any particular portion of the public domain within this state shall be determined according to the use made thereof during the last grazing season, whether such use was as cattle or sheep range and whether the same was used as a spring, summer, fall, winter, or other kind of range; but a single instance of grazing or herding certain kind of livestock on any such range over the protest of others in prior use and occupancy thereof, who graze a different kind of livestock, will not confer a better right.

Source:

L. 29:

p. 443, § 1.

CSA:

C. 160, § 160.

CRS 53:

§ 8-8-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-8-1.

35-45-102. Mixed range apportioned.

Any range being used as a mixed cattle and sheep range may be apportioned and divided between the different classes of livestock, that is cattle or sheep, grazed thereon by the district court having jurisdiction whenever a controversy or dispute arises upon complaint of any interested party using said range. Upon final hearing, any such range shall be apportioned according to the requirements of the different kinds of livestock grazed or herded thereon and the nature of the different parts of the range to be apportioned and in accordance with the equities and rights of the owners of the different kinds of livestock using such range as a class, regard being paid to the extent of the user theretofore made by each class of livestock growers.

Source:

L. 29:

p. 444, § 2.

CSA:

C. 160, § 161.

CRS 53:

§ 8-8-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-8-2.

35-45-103. District court has jurisdiction.

Whenever a dispute arises as to which respective class of livestock has the better right to graze upon any particular portion of said public domain, the district court of the county wherein such disputed area or some part thereof lies has jurisdiction to determine the matters in an action in equity for an injunction to be brought by any person claiming such better right and against any person violating or threatening to violate any such alleged better right. In all actions brought under the terms of this article, service of process may be made in person or by publication, as provided by rule 4 of the Colorado rules of civil procedure, and the procedure shall be as provided by these rules. The plaintiff may proceed against all unknown defendants the same as in an action in rem and may have said disputed area established either as a cattle or sheep range, as the case may be. In such action, if any defendant disclaims or suffers a decree against him by default, no costs shall be taxed against him. The court may in its discretion grant a temporary restraining order or a temporary injunction as in ordinary cases of suits for injunctions.

When such cause is at issue, the court shall in the first instance refer all questions of fact to three referees. Said referees shall be residents of the state of Colorado and two of them, if possible, shall be persons using or residing in the vicinity of the range concerning which the dispute arises, and one of whom shall be engaged in the cattle business and one person engaged in the sheep business, if discreet persons engaged in said businesses are available. The two, immediately upon taking the oath as referees, shall designate some disinterested person to act as a third referee and, subject to such objection as may be made as provided by law, the court may appoint the third person so designated. In the event of failure to agree upon the third member of said board, the court shall have authority to name the third person.

The referees shall possess the qualifications, exercise the powers and functions, and, except as otherwise provided in this section, be subject to the same objections as provided by law, and the procedure before said referees shall be as provided by the Colorado rules of civil procedure. Within ten days after the report of said referees is filed, any party to the action may file written objections to said report, specifically setting forth the objections thereto and asking that the same be modified or disapproved, as the case may be. The court shall thereupon hear and determine all said objections and either approve or set said report aside. Thereupon the court may require additional findings or may assume jurisdiction and determine all questions at issue and enter a decree accordingly. Unless objections are filed to said report, the same shall be final and a decree shall be entered thereon.

Upon final hearing, either upon the report of said referees or at the conclusion of the hearing by the court, if it appears that plaintiff has the preferred or better right to the use of the public domain in question as against the defendants, the court shall enter a decree finding as definitely as may be the boundaries of such disputed area and may enjoin and restrain the defendants and their servants, agents, and employees, from interfering with such right of the plaintiff and others engaged in the same business and award such other relief as justice and equity may require.

Source:

L. 29:

p. 444, § 3.

CSA:

C. 160, § 162.

CRS 53:

§ 8-8-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-8-3.

Cross references:

For procedure before referees, see C.R.C.P. 53.

35-45-104. Contents and posting of notice - violations - penalties.

Whenever any such portion of such public domain is decreed as a sheep or cattle range or it is decreed that the same is entitled to be used by sheep or cattle owners, as the case may be, the court shall enter an order directing the clerk of the court to give notice of the establishment of such range, which notice shall describe the area or boundaries of the range involved, pursuant to the terms of the decree, and state in substance the findings of the court. Three copies of said notice shall be posted at conspicuous places upon said range by the sheriff of the county in which said range is situated and return made to the clerk of said court, and thereafter it is unlawful for any person, whether acting in the person's own behalf or as the agent, servant, or employee of another, to graze or herd stock not entitled to be herded or grazed thereon. Each such person violating this article 45 commits a petty offense. Each day that any such person violates this article 45 constitutes a separate offense.

Source:

L. 29:

p. 446, § 4.

CSA:

C. 160, § 163.

CRS 53:

§ 8-8-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-8-4.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3282, § 643, effective March 1, 2022.

35-45-105. Reapportionment of range.

If any given area has been adjudged to be subject to use either as a cattle or sheep range, any person in interest may thereafter institute a supplemental proceeding in the same court which rendered the original decree, by filing a supplemental petition setting forth that such person has acquired livestock formerly grazed upon such range or ranch property adjacent to said range from an owner who formerly grazed or herded stock thereon. By reason of the change in ownership of such property the livestock theretofore grazed on said range, or part thereof, will no longer be herded or grazed thereon, and said petition may further show that said range can be apportioned and the original decree can be modified so as to permit the herding or grazing of different kinds of livestock upon a portion of said range without injury to or material interference with the rights and business of a majority of the persons then using said range and grazing the kind of livestock for which said range was originally allotted.

All persons using said range shall be made parties to the proceeding, and if upon the final hearing it appears that said range can be further apportioned or that livestock of a different kind can be grazed or herded on a portion of said range theretofore used by a different kind of livestock without injury to the business of a majority of the persons running livestock under the original decree, then such change may be permitted by supplemental decree; but sufficient range shall be left subject to the terms of the original decree to meet the actual requirements of all persons still running livestock of the kind given the preferred or better right under the original decree. Notice of the provisions of said supplemental decree shall be given as in case of an original decree, and thereafter any person using the portion of range described in said supplemental decree in accordance therewith shall not be subject to fine or imprisonment for violation of any of the terms of this article.

Source:

L. 29:

p. 447, § 5.

CSA:

C. 160, § 164.

CRS 53:

§ 8-8-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-8-5.

35-45-106. Overstocking range.

It is declared the policy of this state to preserve the grasses and vegetation on the public domain and protect the wild game of this state in their natural ranges, and especially on the winter ranges, and to prevent erosion of the soil and thereby conserve the waters and water supply originating on the public domain ranges of this state, and to prevent the indiscriminate and unregulated overstocking of such ranges which tends to deplete and destroy such vegetation, increase erosion, and diminish the water supply of the streams and springs of the state of Colorado. After May 19, 1929, when any range is adjudged or decreed to be either a cattle or sheep range under the provisions of this article, any person using such range and any person having the right to use water from any stream or source of supply fed from the watersheds in any such range may apply to the court in a supplemental proceeding to establish that any such range is then overstocked or that said range is about to be overstocked with the kind of livestock which may lawfully be herded or grazed thereon and that the vegetation is being permanently destroyed or is about to be permanently destroyed and the water supply upon which any person is dependent is about to be diminished or impaired.

All persons using said range shall be made parties defendant and the court shall proceed to hear testimony and fully investigate the conditions and determine the number of livestock that may be ranged thereon during the seasons when said range is customarily used for grazing purposes, and if it is fully and satisfactorily established by competent evidence that said range is then overstocked or is about to be overstocked, the court may determine the number of livestock that said range or portion of said range is capable of supporting for a period not exceeding two years, enjoining all persons from willfully or intentionally grazing or herding any greater number upon said range. As between the users of any such range adjudged to be an overstocked range, those who have made prior continuous use of said range in accordance with the customary use thereof and those who have privately owned lands accessible to said range upon which their said livestock can be fed or grazed when not on the public range shall have the preferred right up to the allotted number fixed by decree of court, and any decree entered under the provisions of this section shall so provide.

Source:

L. 29:

p. 448, § 6.

CSA:

C. 160, § 165.

CRS 53:

§ 8-8-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-8-6.

35-45-107. How article construed.

Nothing in sections 35-45-101 to 35-45-106 shall be construed to prohibit free transit over the public domain as provided by the acts of congress or to confer upon any individual as such an exclusive right to the use or occupancy of any part of the public domain.

Source:

L. 29:

p. 449, § 7.

CSA:

C. 160, § 166.

CRS 53:

§ 8-8-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-8-7.

35-45-108. Distribution of receipts.

All moneys received by the state treasurer as the state's share of the amounts collected by the federal government under the provisions of sections 3 and 15 of the "Taylor Grazing Act", and any act amendatory thereof, and under the provisions of Public Law 136, 82nd congress, approved August 31, 1951, shall be credited to a clearing account.

Moneys received under the provisions of section 3 of the "Taylor Grazing Act" which are derived from each grazing district in the state shall be paid over to the counties in which such grazing districts are located, in the proportion that the acreage of each county lying within a particular grazing district bears to the total acreage of such grazing district, as such acreages are certified by the federal agency administering such provisions.

Moneys received under the provisions of section 15 of the "Taylor Grazing Act" and under the provisions of Public Law 136, 82nd congress, shall be paid over to the several counties of the state from which such moneys were derived, as certified in reports furnished by the federal agency administering said provisions.

All such payments shall be calculated by the state treasurer and shall be made to the respective county treasurers during the month of September of each year.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 460, § 1.

CSA:

C. 160, § 166(1).

L. 37:

p. 615, § 1.

L. 45:

p. 601, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 8-8-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-8-8.

L. 73:

p. 1141, § 1.

Cross references:

For creation of grazing districts and other provisions of the "Taylor Grazing Act", see 43 U.S.C. § 315 et seq.

35-45-109. Range improvement fund - board of district advisers.

All moneys paid to the counties shall be deposited with the county treasurer in a special fund to be known as the range improvement fund of district no. __. The county treasurer of any county in which a district is located shall be the ex officio district treasurer and custodian of moneys received and shall be liable upon his official bond for all moneys deposited in said range improvement fund. The county treasurer, as ex officio district treasurer, shall pay out such money in said range improvement fund upon the warrant of the chairman or vice-chairman of the district grazing advisory board or a board of district advisers established pursuant to subsection (2) of this section and after consultation with the district manager of the grazing district in which county the moneys were deposited. Said district grazing advisory boards are established pursuant to Public Law 94-579 (43 U.S.C. sec. 1753) or its successor, as may be established by the secretary of the interior pursuant to the "Federal Advisory Committee Act", Public Law 92-463 (86 Stat. 770; Title 5, App.).

In the event that the grazing advisory boards cease to exist, the commissioner of agriculture shall establish and maintain a board of district advisers for each grazing district upon the petition of a simple majority of the livestock lessees and permittees within the jurisdiction of the district. The function of the board of district advisers shall be to determine the use of the range improvement fund in accordance with section 35-45-110.

The number of advisers on each board and the number of years an adviser may serve shall be determined by the commissioner. Each board shall consist of livestock representatives who shall be lessees or permittees in the district under the board's jurisdiction and shall be chosen by the lessees and permittees in the district through an election prescribed by the commissioner. Each board of district advisers shall meet at least once annually.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 460, § 2.

CSA:

C. 160, § 166(2).

L. 37:

p. 616, § 2.

L. 45:

p. 602, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 8-8-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

8-8-9.

L. 77:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1613, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1076, § 1, effective March 20.

35-45-110. Purposes of fund.

The money deposited in the range improvement fund of any county shall be expended within such county for such purposes as may be directed by the board of district advisers of such grazing district or by the board of county commissioners in counties where there is no grazing district, including range improvements and maintenance, predatory animal control, rodent control, poisonous or noxious weed extermination, the purchase or rental of land and water rights, or for the purpose of the general welfare of livestock grazing within the district, or for any similar purpose.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 617, § 3.

CSA:

C. 160, § 166(3).

L. 45:

p. 602, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 8-8-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-8-10.